Utah statutes.
16-6a-201.   Incorporators.

(1)  One or more persons may act as incorporators of a nonprofit corporation by delivering to the division for filing articles of incorporation meeting the requirements of Section 16-6a-202.

(2)  An incorporator who is a natural person shall be 18 years of age or older.

